apertium-sme-fin.fin.lexc
LEXICON kotus_41_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_41_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:{AV+}{aeiouyäö}	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
0:{AV+}	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_43_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_43_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:e	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_47_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_47_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:ee	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
0:e	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON kotus_48_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:0	kotus_48_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:{AV+}{aeiouyäö}	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
0:{AV+}	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

LEXICON exceptional_10_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller
[CMP=POS]:tk	kotus_10_NOUN/stemfiller	;
0:de	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
0:te	AdjectiveStem/Comparative	;
0:s	AdjectiveStem/Superlative	;

! Possessive/Optional implies Clitic/Optional
LEXICON Possessive/Optional
	Possessive/Obligatory	;
	Clitic/Optional	;
	Ennd	;

LEXICON Possessive/Obligatory
[POSS=SG1]:{←n~}ni	Clitic/Optional		;
[POSS=SG2]:{←n~}si	Clitic/Optional		;
[POSS=SG3]:{←n~}ns{aä}	Clitic/Optional		;
[POSS=PL1]:{←n~}mme	Clitic/Optional		;
[POSS=PL2]:{←n~}nne	Clitic/Optional		;
[POSS=PL3]:{←n~}ns{aä}	Clitic/Optional		;

LEXICON Possessive/Vn
[POSS=SG3]:{←n~}{aeiouyäö}n	Clitic/Optional		;
[POSS=PL3]:{←n~}{aeiouyäö}n	Clitic/Optional		;

LEXICON Possessive/Optional+Vn
	Possessive/Optional	;
	Possessive/Vn	;

LEXICON Possessive/Obligatory+Vn
	Possessive/Obligatory	;
	Possessive/Vn	;

LEXICON Clitic/Optional
	Clitic/Obligatory	;
	Ennd	;

LEXICON Clitic/Optional/Neg
	Clitic/Optional/Neg	;
	Ennd	;

LEXICON Clitic/Obligatory
	Clitic/Obligatory/Rest	;
	Clitic/Obligatory/Neg	;

LEXICON Clitic/Obligatory/Neg
[CLIT=HAN]:h{aä}n	Ennd		;
[CLIT=HAN][CLIT=KAAN]:h{aä}nk{aä}{aä}n	Ennd		;
[CLIT=HAN][CLIT=KO]:h{aä}nk{oö}	Ennd		;
[CLIT=HAN][CLIT=PA]:h{aä}np{aä}	Ennd		;
[CLIT=KO]:k{oö}	Ennd		;
[CLIT=KO][CLIT=HAN]:k{oö}h{aä}n	Ennd		;
[CLIT=KO][CLIT=KAAN]:k{oö}k{aä}{aä}n	Ennd		;
[CLIT=KO][CLIT=KIN]:k{oö}kin	Ennd		;
[CLIT=KO][CLIT=PA]:k{oö}p{aä}	Ennd		;
[CLIT=KO][CLIT=S]:k{oö}s	Ennd		;
[CLIT=PA]:p{aä}	Ennd		;
[CLIT=PA][CLIT=HAN]:p{aä}h{aä}n	Ennd		;
[CLIT=PA][CLIT=KAAN]:p{aä}k{aä}{aä}n	Ennd		;
[CLIT=PA][CLIT=KIN]:p{aä}kin	Ennd		;
[CLIT=PA][CLIT=KO]:p{aä}k{oö}	Ennd		;
[CLIT=PA][CLIT=S]:p{aä}s	Ennd		;

LEXICON Clitic/Obligatory/Rest
[CLIT=KIN]:kin	Ennd		;
[CLIT=KIN][CLIT=HAN]:kinh{aä}n	Ennd		;
[CLIT=KIN][CLIT=KAAN]:kink{aä}{aä}n	Ennd		;
[CLIT=KIN][CLIT=KO]:kink{oö}	Ennd		;
[CLIT=KIN][CLIT=PA]:kinp{aä}	Ennd		;
[CLIT=KAAN]:k{aä}{aä}n	Ennd		;
[CLIT=KAAN][CLIT=HAN]:k{aä}{aä}nh{aä}n	Ennd		;
[CLIT=KAAN][CLIT=KIN]:k{aä}{aä}nkin	Ennd		;
[CLIT=KAAN][CLIT=KO]:k{aä}{aä}nk{oö}	Ennd		;
[CLIT=KAAN][CLIT=PA]:k{aä}{aä}np{aä}	Ennd		;


LEXICON Compounding
	Compounding/Undashed	;
	Compounding/Dashed	;

LEXICON Compounding/Undashed
[BOUNDARY=COMPOUND][GUESS=COMPOUND]:{#}	Compounding/Middle		;

LEXICON Compounding/Dashed
[BOUNDARY=COMPOUND][GUESS=COMPOUND]:-	Compounding/Middle		;
[COMPOUND_FORM=OMIT]:-	Ennd	; ! missing compound parts may be dashed




! Derived forms, not considered part of standard inflection, may be dropped from
! some applications

! Denominals

LEXICON NounStem/Nominative
[GUESS=DERIVE][DRV=INEN][POS=ADJECTIVE]:{←i~0}{AV+}i	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller		;
[GUESS=DERIVE][DRV=LAINEN][POS=ADJECTIVE]:l{aä}i	kotus_38_ADJECTIVE/stemfiller		;

LEXICON NounStem/Plural/Weak
[GUESS=DERIVE][NUM=PL][DRV=TSE][POS=ADVERB][CASE=PRL]:{AV-}itse	Clitic/Optional		;
[GUESS=DERIVE][NUM=PL][DRV=TTAIN][POS=ADVERB][CASE=DIS]:{AV-}itt{aä}in	Clitic/Optional		;

LEXICON NounStem/Singular/Weak
[GUESS=DERIVE][NUM=SG][DRV=TSE][POS=ADVERB][CASE=PRL]:{AV-}tse	Clitic/Optional	 ;
[GUESS=DERIVE][DRV=LLINEN][POS=NOUN]:{AV-}lli	kotus_38_NOUN/stemfiller		;
[GUESS=DERIVE][DRV=LLINEN][DRV=VS][POS=NOUN]:{AV-}llis{uy}{uy}	kotus_40_NOUN/stemfiller		;
[GUESS=DERIVE][DRV=STI][POS=ADVERB]:{AV-}sti	Clitic/Optional		;
[GUESS=DERIVE][DRV=TAR][POS=NOUN]:{AV-}t{t~~}{aä}r{C}	kotus_32_NOUN/stemfiller		;
[GUESS=DERIVE][DRV=TON][POS=NOUN]:{AV-}t{oö}	kotus_34_NOUN/stemfiller		;
! Deadjectivals

LEXICON AdjectiveStem/Superlative
[GUESS=DERIVE][DRV=STI][POS=ADVERB][CMP=SUP]:{AV-}immin Clitic/Optional ;

LEXICON AdjectiveStem/Comparative
[GUESS=DERIVE][DRV=STI][POS=ADVERB][CMP=CMP]:{AV-}mmin	Clitic/Optional	;


! Deverbals

LEXICON VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple
[GUESS=DERIVE][VOICE=PSS][PCP=NUT][DRV=VS][POS=NOUN]:{AV-}{t~~}{uy}{uy}	kotus_40_NOUN/stemfiller		;

LEXICON VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/C
[GUESS=DERIVE][VOICE=PSS][PCP=NUT][DRV=VS][POS=NOUN]:{AV-}{t~~}{uy}{uy}{C}	kotus_40_NOUN/stemfiller		;

LEXICON VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/F
[GUESS=DERIVE][VOICE=PSS][PCP=NUT][DRV=VS][POS=NOUN]:{AV-}{t~~}{uy}{uy}{F}	kotus_40_NOUN/stemfiller		;

LEXICON VerbAllomorph/NUTPassiveParticiple/I
[GUESS=DERIVE][VOICE=PSS][PCP=NUT][DRV=VS][POS=NOUN]:{AV-}{t~~}{uy}{uy}{I}	kotus_40_NOUN/stemfiller		;

LEXICON VerbStem/Present
[GUESS=DERIVE][DRV=JA][POS=NOUN]:{←e~i}{AV+}j	kotus_12_NOUN/stemfiller	;

LEXICON kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller
[DRV=U]:{AV+}{uy}	kotus_2_NOUN/stemfiller		;

! Digit strings inflect with colons

LEXICON DigitStem5i
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Clitic/Obligatory	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:n	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:iin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:tt{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:lt{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:ll{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:st{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:n{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ss{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:j{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ihin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:itt{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:ilt{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:ill{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:in{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:ist{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:iss{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;

LEXICON DigitStem7
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Clitic/Obligatory	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:n	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:een	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:tt{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:lt{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:ll{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:st{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:n{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ss{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:i{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:iin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:itt{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:ilt{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:ill{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:in{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:ist{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:iss{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;

LEXICON Postpositions
joukkoon'][POS=POSTPOSITION]:joukkoon	 Possessive/Optional ;
kaltainen'][POS=POSTPOSITION]:kaltaise  Possessive/Obligatory   ;
kesken'][POS=POSTPOSITION]:kesken	Possessive/Optional	;
keskuudessa'][POS=POSTPOSITION]:keskuudessa	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
kimppuun'][POS=POSTPOSITION]:kimppuun	Possessive/Optional	;
lähettyviltä'][POS=POSTPOSITION]:lähettyviltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
mukaan'][POS=POSTPOSITION]:mukaan	Possessive/Optional	;
perältä'][POS=POSTPOSITION]:perältä	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
pohjasta'][POS=POSTPOSITION]:pohjasta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
päähän'][POS=POSTPOSITION]:päähän	 Possessive/Optional ;
sisästä'][POS=POSTPOSITION]:sisästä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
vastaan'][POS=POSTPOSITION]:vastaan	Possessive/Optional	;
LEXICON Prepositions
keskeltä'][POS=PREPOSITION]:keskeltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
LEXICON Adpositions
lähettyvillä'][POS=ADPOSITION]:lähettyvillä	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
perältä'][POS=ADPOSITION]:perältä	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
haltuun'][POS=ADPOSITION]:haltuun	Possessive/Optional	;
kimppuun'][POS=ADPOSITION]:kimppuun	Possessive/Optional	;
kintereillä'][POS=ADPOSITION]:kintereillä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
ulottuviin'][POS=ADPOSITION]:ulottuviin	Possessive/Optional	;
äärestä'][POS=ADPOSITION]:äärestä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
LEXICON Adverbs
ateistisesti'][POS=ADVERB]:ateistisesti	Clitic/Optional	;
häävisti'][POS=ADVERB]:häävisti	Clitic/Optional	;
kiusanpäiten'][POS=ADVERB]:kiusanpäiten	Clitic/Optional	;
lähimmin'][POS=ADVERB]:lähimmin	Clitic/Optional	;
oraakkelimaisesti'][POS=ADVERB]:oraakkelimaisesti	Clitic/Optional	;
rahvaanomaisesti'][POS=ADVERB]:rahvaanomaisesti	Clitic/Optional	;
topakasti'][POS=ADVERB]:topakasti	Clitic/Optional	;
hajasäärin'][POS=ADVERB]:haja{#}säärin	Clitic/Optional	;
hätäännyksissä'][POS=ADVERB]:hätäännyksissä	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
kateissa'][POS=ADVERB]:kateissa	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
paikalle'][POS=ADVERB]:paikalle	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
piloilla'][POS=ADVERB]:piloilla	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
seisovilta'][POS=ADVERB]:seisovilta	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
sirrillä'][POS=ADVERB]:sirrillä	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
hajalle'][POS=ADVERB]:hajalle	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
lopulla'][POS=ADVERB]:lopulla	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
riipalla'][POS=ADVERB]:riipalla	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
valveille'][POS=ADVERB]:valveille	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
LEXICON Prefixes
eliitti@P.NEED.NOMINAL@'][POS=PREFIX]:eliitti@P.NEED.NOMINAL@	Compounding	;
ferro@P.NEED.NOMINAL@'][POS=PREFIX]:ferro@P.NEED.NOMINAL@	Compounding	;
iso@P.NEED.NOMINAL@'][POS=PREFIX]:iso@P.NEED.NOMINAL@	Compounding	;
kolmois@P.NEED.NOMINAL@'][POS=PREFIX]:kolmois@P.NEED.NOMINAL@	Compounding	;
maksi@P.NEED.NOMINAL@'][POS=PREFIX]:maksi@P.NEED.NOMINAL@	Compounding	;
nano@P.NEED.NOMINAL@'][POS=PREFIX]:nano@P.NEED.NOMINAL@	Compounding	;
perintö@P.NEED.NOMINAL@'][POS=PREFIX]:perintö@P.NEED.NOMINAL@	Compounding	;
raaka@P.NEED.NOMINAL@'][POS=PREFIX]:raaka@P.NEED.NOMINAL@	Compounding	;
uinti@P.NEED.NOMINAL@'][POS=PREFIX]:uinti@P.NEED.NOMINAL@	Compounding	;
valko@P.NEED.NOMINAL@'][POS=PREFIX]:valko@P.NEED.NOMINAL@	Compounding	;
LEXICON Pronouns
itse'][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEX][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:itseihin	Possessive/Optional	;
itse'][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEX][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:itseiksi	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
itse'][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEX][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:itseen	Possessive/Optional	;
kaikki'][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=INDEF][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:kaikelle	Clitic/Optional	;
tuo'][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=DEMONSTR][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:noina	Clitic/Optional	;
LEXICON kotus_67_VERB/stub
hyräillä'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:hyräil{^front}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
kilpailla'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:kilpail{^back}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
kuulla'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:kuul{^back}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
nuolla'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:nuol{^back}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
pyöriskellä'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:pyöriskel{^front}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
urheilla'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:urheil{^back}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
piileskellä'][POS=VERB][KTN=67]:pii{#}leskel{^front}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
heitellä'][POS=VERB][KTN=67][KAV=C]:heit{t~~}el{^front}{C}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
hiihdellä'][POS=VERB][KTN=67][KAV=F]:hiih{t~~}el{^front}{F}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
käyskennellä'][POS=VERB][KTN=67][KAV=J]:käysken{t~~}el{^front}{J}	kotus_67_VERB/stemfiller	;
